District of Columbia statutes.
16-1155

Restoration of property to life tenant.

The possession of real property that has been awarded to a petitioner pursuant to this subchapter, upon the presumption of the death of the person upon whose life the prior estate depends, shall be restored, by an order of the court, to the person evicted, or to his heirs, or legal representatives, upon the petition of the latter, and proof, to the satisfaction of the court, that the person presumed to be dead is living. The proceedings upon such a petition are the same as those prescribed by this subchapter to be followed upon the petition of the person to whom possession is awarded.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 16-1155.
1973 Ed., § 16-1155.